src-fst-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
# Noun inflection and derivation




## Noun stem variation and allomorph selection
The nominal stems were classified according to what is the stem variation
and what allomorphs they select. This section lists all the possible
variations and all their allomorph selections. Each class description 
gives the key forms that can be used when classifying new words, the 
examples of inflection and negative examples for the most obvious missed
allomorphs and differentiating factors. The example list should be at 
least:
singular nominative, singular essive, singular inessive, plural essive,
plural elative, singular partitives, singular illatives, plural partitives
plural GENITIVEs, plural illatives and the compound forms.

### Noun stems without stem variation
The most basic noun stem does not have any stem internal variation and
uses few commonest allomorphs. The words in this class are either 
bisyllabic or have one of common derivational suffixes: sto, ....
The nouns in this class end in o, u, y or ö, which determines their 
illative suffix and therefore exact classification:

*Noun 1o examples:*
* *talo:* `talo+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # house)
* *talona:* `talo+N+Sg+Ess`
* *talossa:* `talo+N+Sg+Ine`
* *taloina:* `talo+N+Pl+Ess`
* *taloista:* `talo+N+Pl+Ela`
* *taloa:* `talo+N+Sg+Par`
* ★*talota:* `talo+N+Sg+Par` (is not standard language)
* *taloon:* `talo+N+Sg+Ill`
* ★*taloseen:* `talo+N+Sg+Ill` (is not standard language)
* *taloja:* `talo+N+Pl+Par`
* ★*taloita:* `talo+N+Pl+Par` (is not standard language)
* *talojen:* `talo+N+Pl+Gen`
* ★*taloiden:* `talo+N+Pl+Gen` (is not standard language)
* ★*taloitten:* `talo+N+Pl+Gen` (is not standard language)
* *taloihin:* `talo+N+Pl+Ill`
* *talojuttu:* `talo+N+Sg+Nom#juttu+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # house thing)
* *talonjuttu:* `talo+N+Sg+Gen#juttu+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # house’s thing)
* *talojenjuttu:* `talo+N+Pl+Gen#juttu+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # houses’ thing)

*Nouns 1o non-standard examples:*
* *taloin:* `talo+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen`
* *talohon:* `talo+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill`

The stems ending in u are also without variationm and the bisyllabic ones
have the same simple allomorph pattern:

*Noun 1u examples:*
* *asu:* `asu+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # outfit)
* *asua:* `asu+N+Sg+Par`
* *asuun:* `asu+N+Sg+Ill`
* *asuna:* `asu+N+Sg+Ess`
* *asussa:* `asu+N+Sg+Ine`
* *asuja:* `asu+N+Pl+Par`
* *asujen:* `asu+N+Pl+Gen`
* *asuihin:* `asu+N+Pl+Ill`
* *asuina:* `asu+N+Pl+Ess`
* *asuissa:* `asu+N+Pl+Ine`

*Nouns 1u non-standard examples:*
* *asuin:* `asu+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen`
* *asuhun:* `asu+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill`




*Noun 1y examples:*
* *kärry:* `kärry+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # cart)
* *kärryä:* `kärry+N+Sg+Par`
* *kärryyn:* `kärry+N+Sg+Ill`
* *kärrynä:* `kärry+N+Sg+Ess`
* *kärryssä:* `kärry+N+Sg+Ine`
* *kärryjä:* `kärry+N+Pl+Par`
* *kärryjen:* `kärry+N+Pl+Gen`
* *kärryihin:* `kärry+N+Pl+Ill`
* *kärryinä:* `kärry+N+Pl+Ess`
* *kärryissä:* `kärry+N+Pl+Ine`

*Nouns 1y non-standard examples:*
* *kärryin:* `kärry+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen`
* *kärryhyn:* `kärry+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill`


*Nouns 1ö examples:*
* *mömmö:* `mömmö+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # gunk)
* *mömmöä:* `mömmö+N+Sg+Par`
* *mömmöön:* `mömmö+N+Sg+Ill`
* *mömmönä:* `mömmö+N+Sg+Ess`
* *mömmössä:* `mömmö+N+Sg+Ine`
* *mömmöjä:* `mömmö+N+Pl+Par`
* *mömmöjen:* `mömmö+N+Pl+Gen`
* *mömmöihin:* `mömmö+N+Pl+Ill`
* *mömmöinä:* `mömmö+N+Pl+Ess`
* *mömmöissä:* `mömmö+N+Pl+Ine`

*Nouns 1ö non-standard examples:*
* *mömmöin:* `mömmö+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen`
* *mömmöhön:* `mömmö+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill`

### Basic gradation cases
The basic stems without variations other than consonant gradation.

*Nouns 1ko examples:*
* *ukko:* `ukko+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # geezer)
* *ukossa:* `ukko+N+Sg+Ine`
* *ukoista:* `ukko+N+Pl+Ela`
* *ukkoihin:* `ukko+N+Pl+Ill`

*Nouns 1ko non-standard examples:*
* *ukkoin:* `ukko+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen`
* *ukkohon:* `ukko+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill`



*Nouns 1ku examples:*
* *tikku:* `tikku+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # stick)
* *tikussa:* `tikku+N+Sg+Ine`
* *tikuista:* `tikku+N+Pl+Ela`
* *tikkuihin:* `tikku+N+Pl+Ill`

*Nouns 1ku non-standard examples:*
* *tikkuin:* `tikku+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen`
* *tikkuhun:* `tikku+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill`






*Nouns 1ky examples:*
* *myrkky:* `myrkky+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # poison)
* *myrkyssä:* `myrkky+N+Sg+Ine`
* *myrkyistä:* `myrkky+N+Pl+Ela`
* *myrkkyihin:* `myrkky+N+Pl+Ill`

*Nouns 1ky non-standard examples:*
* *myrkkyin:* `myrkky+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen`
* *myrkkyhyn:* `myrkky+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill`


*Nouns 1kö examples:*
* *yökkö:* `yökkö+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # nightfly)
* *yökössä:* `yökkö+N+Sg+Ine`
* *yököistä:* `yökkö+N+Pl+Ela`
* *yökköihin:* `yökkö+N+Pl+Ill`

*Nouns 1kö non-standard examples:*
* *yökköin:* `yökkö+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen`
* *yökköhön:* `yökkö+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill`


*Nouns 1po examples:*
* *happo:* `happo+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # acid)
* *hapossa:* `happo+N+Sg+Ine`
* *hapoista:* `happo+N+Pl+Ela`
* *happoihin:* `happo+N+Pl+Ill`

*Nouns 1po non-standard examples:*
* *happoin:* `happo+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen`
* *happohon:* `happo+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill`



*Nouns 1pu examples:*
* *lippu:* `lippu+N+Sg+Nom`
* *lipussa:* `lippu+N+Sg+Ine`
* *lipuista:* `lippu+N+Pl+Ela`
* *lippuihin:* `lippu+N+Pl+Ill`

*Nouns 1pu non-standard examples:*
* *lippuin:* `lippu+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen`
* *lippuhun:* `lippu+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill`



*Nouns 1py examples:*
* *ryyppy:* `ryyppy+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # swirl)
* *ryypyssä:* `ryyppy+N+Sg+Ine`
* *ryypyistä:* `ryyppy+N+Pl+Ela`
* *ryyppyihin:* `ryyppy+N+Pl+Ill`

*Nouns 1py non-standard examples:*
* *ryyppyin:* `ryyppy+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen`
* *ryyppyhyn:* `ryyppy+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill`


*Nouns 1pö examples:*
* *törppö:* `törppö+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # bozo)
* *törpössä:* `törppö+N+Sg+Ine`
* *törpöistä:* `törppö+N+Pl+Ela`
* *törppöihin:* `törppö+N+Pl+Ill`

*Nouns 1pö non-standard examples:*
* *törppöin:* `törppö+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen`
* *törppöhön:* `törppö+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill`


*Nouns 1to examples:*
* *hirtto:* `hirtto+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # hanging)
* *hirtossa:* `hirtto+N+Sg+Ine`
* *hirtoista:* `hirtto+N+Pl+Ela`
* *hirttoihin:* `hirtto+N+Pl+Ill`

*Nouns 1to non-standard examples:*
* *hirttoin:* `hirtto+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen`
* *hirttohon:* `hirtto+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill`



*Nouns 1tu examples:*
* *torttu:* `torttu+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # tart)
* *tortussa:* `torttu+N+Sg+Ine`
* *tortuista:* `torttu+N+Pl+Ela`
* *torttuihin:* `torttu+N+Pl+Ill`

*Nouns 1tu non-standard examples:*
* *torttuin:* `torttu+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen`
* *torttuhon:* `torttu+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill`



*Nouns 1ty examples:*
* *pytty:* `pytty+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # cup)
* *pytyssä:* `pytty+N+Sg+Ine`
* *pytyistä:* `pytty+N+Pl+Ela`
* *pyttyihin:* `pytty+N+Pl+Ill`

*Nouns 1ty non-standard examples:*
* *pyttyin:* `pytty+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen`
* *pyttyhyn:* `pytty+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill`


*Nouns 1tö examples:*
* *pönttö:* `pönttö+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # pot)
* *pöntössä:* `pönttö+N+Sg+Ine`
* *pöntöistä:* `pönttö+N+Pl+Ela`
* *pönttöihin:* `pönttö+N+Pl+Ill`

*Nouns 1tö non-standard examples:*
* *pönttöin:* `pönttö+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen`
* *pönttöhön:* `pönttö+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill`


Between two vowels, the weak grade of k is optionally an apostrophe
instead. For k that is not optionally ’, for example when it is after a
consonant other than s, the variation is k ~ 0 instead (e.g. NOUN_UKKO).

*Nouns 1ko examples:*
* *teko:* `teko+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # action)
* *teossa:* `teko+N+Sg+Ine`
* *te’ossa:* `teko+N+Sg+Ine`

*Nouns 1ko non-standard examples:*
* *tekoin:* `teko+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen`
* *tekohon:* `teko+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill`



*Nouns 1ku examples:*
* *maku:* `maku+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # taste)
* *maussa:* `maku+N+Sg+Ine`
* *ma’ussa:* `maku+N+Sg+Ine`

*Nouns 1ku non-standard examples:*
* *makuin:* `maku+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen`
* *makuhon:* `maku+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill`



*Nouns 1ky examples:*
* *näky:* `näky+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # vision)
* *näyssä:* `näky+N+Sg+Ine`
* *nä’yssä:* `näky+N+Sg+Ine`

*Nouns 1ky non-standard examples:*
* *näkyin:* `näky+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen`
* *näkyhyn:* `näky+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill`


*Nouns 1kö examples:*
* *näkö:* `näkö+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # eyesight)
* *näössä:* `näkö+N+Sg+Ine`
* *nä’össä:* `näkö+N+Sg+Ine`

*Nouns 1kö non-standard examples:*
* *näköin:* `näkö+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen`
* *näköhön:* `näkö+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill`

Between three vowels where k is surrounded by same vowels the k becomes
obligatorily ’. When the vowels are different, it becomes optionally
’ (as in NOUN_TEKO), and after consonant other than s it is k ~ 0 
(as in NOUN_UKKO).

*Nouns 1ko examples:*
* *ruoko:* `ruoko+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # straw)
* *ruo’ossa:* `ruoko+N+Sg+Ine`

*Nouns 1ko non-standard examples:*
* *ruokoin:* `ruoko+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen`
* *ruokohon:* `ruoko+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill`



*Nouns 1ko examples:*
* *liuku:* `liuku+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # slide)
* *liu’ussa:* `liuku+N+Sg+Ine`

*Nouns 1ku non-standard examples:*
* *liukuin:* `liuku+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen`
* *liukuhun:* `liuku+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill`

There is a gap in paradigms in y and ö finals of k:’

Other gradations can be more easily caught from the preceding context.

*Nouns 1po examples:*
* *hepo:* `hepo+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # horse)
* *hevossa:* `hepo+N+Sg+Ine`
* *hepoina:* `hepo+N+Pl+Ess`
* *hevoista:* `hepo+N+Pl+Ela`

*Nouns 1ku non-standard examples:*
* *hepoin:* `hepo+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen`
* *hepohon:* `hepo+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill`



*Nouns 1pu examples:*
* *apu:* `apu+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # help)
* *avussa:* `apu+N+Sg+Ine`
* *apuihin:* `apu+N+Pl+Ill`
* *avuista:* `apu+N+Pl+Ela`

*Nouns 1pu non-standard examples:*
* *apuin:* `apu+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen`
* *apuhun:* `apu+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill`



*Nouns 1py examples:*
* *käpy:* `käpy+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # pinecone)
* *kävyssä:* `käpy+N+Sg+Ine`
* *käpyihin:* `käpy+N+Pl+Ill`
* *kävyistä:* `käpy+N+Pl+Ela`

*Nouns 1py non-standard examples:*
* *käpyin:* `käpy+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen`
* *käpyhyn:* `käpy+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill`


*Nouns 1pö examples:*
* *löpö:* `löpö+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # gasoline)
* *lövössä:* `löpö+N+Sg+Ine`
* *löpöihin:* `löpö+N+Pl+Ill`
* *lövöistä:* `löpö+N+Pl+Ela`

*Nouns 1pö non-standard examples:*
* *löpöin:* `löpö+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen`
* *löpöhyn:* `löpö+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill`


*Nouns 1to examples:*
* *veto:* `veto+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # draft)
* *vedossa:* `veto+N+Sg+Ine`
* *vetoihin:* `veto+N+Pl+Ill`
* *vedoista:* `veto+N+Pl+Ela`

*Nouns 1to non-standard examples:*
* *vetoin:* `veto+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen`
* *vetohon:* `veto+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill`



*Nouns 1to examples:*
* *kuitu:* `kuitu+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # fiber)
* *kuidussa:* `kuitu+N+Sg+Ine`
* *kuituihin:* `kuitu+N+Pl+Ill`
* *kuiduista:* `kuitu+N+Pl+Ela`

*Nouns 1tu non-standard examples:*
* *kuituin:* `kuitu+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen`
* *kuituhon:* `kuitu+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill`



*Nouns 1ty examples:*
* *vety:* `vety+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # hydrogen)
* *vedyssä:* `vety+N+Sg+Ine`
* *vetyihin:* `vety+N+Pl+Ill`
* *vedyistä:* `vety+N+Pl+Ela`

*Nouns 1ty non-standard examples:*
* *vetyin:* `vety+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen`
* *vetyhyn:* `vety+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill`


*Nouns 1tö examples:*
* *häätö:* `häätö+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # evictment)
* *häädössä:* `häätö+N+Sg+Ine`
* *häädöistä:* `häätö+N+Pl+Ela`
* *häätöihin:* `häätö+N+Pl+Ill`

*Nouns 1tö non-standard examples:*
* *häätöin:* `häätö+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen`
* *häätöhön:* `häätö+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill`


*Nouns 1nko examples:*
* *runko:* `runko+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # body)
* *rungossa:* `runko+N+Sg+Ine`
* *rungoista:* `runko+N+Pl+Ela`
* *runkoihin:* `runko+N+Pl+Ill`

*Nouns 1nko non-standard examples:*
* *runkoin:* `runko+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen`
* *runkohon:* `runko+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill`



*Nouns 1nku examples:*
* *vinku:* `vinku+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # squeal)
* *vingussa:* `vinku+N+Sg+Ine`
* *vinguista:* `vinku+N+Pl+Ela`
* *vinkuihin:* `vinku+N+Pl+Ill`

*Nouns 1nku non-standard examples:*
* *vinkuin:* `vinku+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen`
* *vinkuhun:* `vinku+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill`



*Nouns 1nky examples:*
* *sänky:* `sänky+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # bed)
* *sängyssä:* `sänky+N+Sg+Ine`
* *sängyistä:* `sänky+N+Pl+Ela`
* *sänkyihin:* `sänky+N+Pl+Ill`

*Nouns 1nky non-standard examples:*
* *sänkyin:* `sänky+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen`
* *sänkyhyn:* `sänky+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill`


*Nouns 1nkö examples:*
* *ylänkö:* `ylänkö+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # highlands)
* *ylängössä:* `ylänkö+N+Sg+Ine`
* *ylängöistä:* `ylänkö+N+Pl+Ela`
* *ylänköihin:* `ylänkö+N+Pl+Ill`
